Utah statutes.
70A-3-402.   Signature by representative.
(1)  If a person acting, or purporting to act, as a representative signs an
instrument by signing either the name of the represented person or the name of
the signer, the represented person is bound by the signature to the same
extent the represented person would be bound if the signature were on a simple
contract. If the represented person is bound, the signature of the
representative is the "authorized signature of the represented person" and the
represented person is liable on the instrument, whether or not identified in
the instrument.
(2)  If a representative signs the name of the representative to an instrument
and the signature is an authorized signature of the represented person, the
following rules apply:
(a)  If the form of the signature shows unambiguously that the signature is
made on behalf of the represented person who is identified in the instrument,
the representative is not liable on the instrument.
(b)  Subject to Subsection (3), if the form of the signature does not show
unambiguously that the signature is made in a representative capacity or the
represented person is not identified in the instrument, the representative is
liable on the instrument to a holder in due course that took the instrument
without notice that the representative was not intended to be liable on the
instrument.  With respect to any other person, the representative is liable on
the instrument unless the representative proves that the original parties did
not intend the representative to be liable on the instrument.
(3)  If a representative signs the name of the representative as drawer of a
check without indication of the representative status and the check is payable
from an account of the represented person who is identified on the check, the
signer is not liable on the check if the signature is an authorized signature
of the represented person.
